Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska16-731
County treasurer; monthly payment of bond fund money; when.

Any city of the first class may request that bond fund money be included with payments distributed under subsection (3) of section 23-1601. Such bond fund money shall be included in the monthly payment until notified otherwise by the city.

Laws 1978, LB 847, § 2.